District of Columbia statutes.
48-402.02

Limitation on expenditures.

No more than $400,000 in Fiscal Year 2016 and $350,000 in each fiscal year thereafter shall be used by the Mayor to implement the Urban Farming and Gardens Program pursuant to § 48-402, the Urban Farming Land Leasing Initiative pursuant to § 48-402.01, the real property tax abatement for urban agricultural uses pursuant to § 47-868, the maintenance of tax-exempt status pursuant to § 47-1005(c), and the tax credits for food donations pursuant to §§ 47-1806.14, 47-1807.12, and 47-1808.12.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-210, § 3b
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6182, 62 DCR 10905

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 6182 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).